Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [246C.051] CLASSIFICATION ALIGNMENT FOR DIRECT CARE AND TREATMENT EMPLOYEES. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 43A.08; Minnesota Rules, part 3900.1300; or any other law to the contrary, Direct Care and Treatment may, with approval from Minnesota Management and Budget, convert employees deemed unclassified pursuant to pilot authority of the Department of Human Services under Laws 1997, chapter 97, section 18, into the classified service. new text end new text begin (b) Employees converted to the classified service pursuant to this section are subject to the terms and conditions of employment applicable to positions in the classified service pursuant to statute, rule, bargaining unit or compensation plan, and agency policy, including but not limited to required probationary periods and mandatory training requirements. new text end new text begin (c) Employees converted to the classified service pursuant to this section must not receive a reduction in salary at the time of the conversion. new text end